Maine, session 132, LD116.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 32 MRSA §4321, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2007, c. 184, §1, is further
amended to read:
2. Body piercing. "Body piercing" means the creation of an opening in the body of a
human being for the purpose of inserting jewelry or other decoration. This includes, but is
not limited to, piercing of an ear, lip, tongue, nose or eyebrow. "Body piercing" does not,
for the purpose of this chapter, include piercing an earlobe with a disposable, single-use
stud or solid needle that is applied using a mechanical device to force the needle or stud
through the earlobe. Piercing in an area other than the earlobe, located at the lower end of
the ear, is "body piercing" as defined in this subsection and subject to the licensing
requirements of this chapter.
Sec. 2. 32 MRSA §4321, sub-§6 is enacted to read:
6. Piercing gun. "Piercing gun" means a mechanical device that is used to create an
opening in the body of a human being by forcing a disposable single-use stud or solid
needle through the skin.
Sec. 3. 32 MRSA §4331 is enacted to read:
§4331. Use of piercing gun prohibited
The use of a piercing gun to create a body piercing or to apply a stud or any other
jewelry to any part of the body of a human being is prohibited.